New Jersey, session 222, A3477.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Blue Acres Buyout Fund (hereinafter referred to as the "fund") is established in the Department of Environmental Protection as a nonlapsing, revolving fund.  All monies appropriated pursuant to this act, monies appropriated annually by law for the purposes of the fund, and any other grants received by the State for the purposes of the fund shall be deposited into the fund.    All interest or other income or earnings derived from the investment or reinvestment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.  The fund shall be administered by the Department of Environmental Protection.   No more than five percent of the total annual revenue allocated to the fund in each fiscal year may be used by the department for administrative costs. b.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Environmental Protection for: (1) relocation assistance for homeowners displaced by a Blue Acres acquisition; (2) relocation assistance for tenants in single family and multifamily housing displaced by a Blue Acres acquisition of their rental property; and (3) the Blue Acres cost to the State for the acquisition of lands for a Blue Acres project. c.  As used in this section, Blue Acres cost and Blue Acres project mean the same as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-45). 2.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Blue Acres Buyout Fund, established pursuant to section 1 of this act, the sum of $25 million. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.